Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.01.520

Domestic corporations—Filing, initial, and annual license fees.

For the privilege of doing business, every domestic corporation, except one for which existing law provides a different fee schedule, shall pay a fee for the filing of its articles of incorporation and its first year's license, and an annual license fee for each year following incorporation on or before the expiration of its corporate license, in an amount established by the secretary of state under RCW 23.95.260.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2109; 1989 c 165 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.